zh-TW: 場景模式: 3D 攝影; 自動; 背光; 海灘; 燭光; 特寫; 菜餚; 黎明; 文件; 黃昏; 忠誠; 細節; 煙火; 花卉; 食物; 合照; HDR 背光控制; 手持夜景; 景觀; 單色; 夜間; 全景; 肖像; 光滑皮膚; 雪; 運動; 聚光燈; 水下; 其他
zh-CN: 场景模式: 3D 摄影; 自动; 背光; 海滩; 烛光; 近摄; 美食; 黎明; 文件; 黄昏; 可信; 细节; 烟花; 花; 食物; 合影; HDR 背光控制; 手持夜景; 景观; 单色; 夜间; 全景; 人像; 光滑的皮肤; 雪地; 体育; 聚光灯; 水下; 其他
ko: 장면 모드: 3D 사진; 자동; 백라이트; 해변; 촛불; 클로즈업; 요리; 새벽; 서류; 황혼; 충실한; 미세한 디테일; 불꽃놀이; 꽃; 식품; 단체사진; HDR 백라이트 제어; 핸드헬드 야경; 풍경; 모노크롬; 밤; 파노라마; 인물; 매끄러운 피부; 눈; 스포츠; 스포트라이트; 수중; 기타
sl-SI: Scenski načini: 3D fotografija; Samodejno; Osvetlitev ozadja; Plaža; Svetloba sveč; Od blizu; Kulinarika; Zora; Dokumenti; Mrak; Faithful; Fine podrobnosti; Ognjemet; Cvet; Hrana; Skupinska fotografija; HDR nadzor osvetlitve ozadja; Ročni nočni prizor; Pokrajina; Enobarvno; Noč; Panorama; Portret; Gladka koža; Sneg; Šport; Izpostavljenost središča; Pod vodo; Drugo
fr: Modes de scènes: Photographie 3D; Automatique; Contre-jour; Plage; Lueur; Gros plan; Cuisine; Aube; Documents; Crépuscule; Fidèle; Détaillé; Feux d'artifice; Fleur; Nourriture; Photo de groupe; Contrôle du contre-jour HDR; Scène de nuit; Paysage; Monochrome; Nuit; Panorama; Portrait; Peau lisse; Neige; Sport; Projecteurs; Sous-marin; Autre
de: Szenenmodi: 3D-Fotografie; Auto; Hintergrundbeleuchtung; Strand; Kerzenlicht; Nahaufnahme; Cuisine; Morgendämmerung; Dokumente; Abenddämmerung; Wahrheitsgetreu; Feines Detail; Feuerwerk; Blume; Lebensmittel; Gruppenfoto; HDR-Hintergrundbeleuchtungseinstellung; Hand-Nachtaufnahme; Landschaft; Monochrom; Nacht; Panorama; Porträt; Glatte Haut; Schnee; Sport; Spotlight; Unterwasser; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Режими на сцена: 3D фотография; Авто; Подсветка; Плаж; Свещи; Близък план; Кухня; Зора; Документи; Здрач; Верен; Фини детайли; Фойерверки; Цвете; Храна; Групова снимка; HDR контрол на подсветката; Нощна сцена от ръка; Пейзаж; Монохромен; Нощ; Панорама; Портрет; Гладка кожа; Сняг; Спорт; Прожектор; Под вода; Други
fi: Kuvaelmatilat: 3D-valokuvaus; Automaattinen; Taustavalo; Ranta; Kynttilänvalo; Lähikuva; Ruoka; Aamunkoitto; Asiakirjat; Auringonlasku; Alkuperäinen; Yksityiskohtainen; Ilotulitus; Kukka; Ruoka; Ryhmäkuva; HDR-taustavalon ohjaus; Kädessä pidettävä yökuvaus; Maisema; Mustavalkoinen; Yö; Panoraama; Muotokuva; Sileä iho; Lumi; Urheilu; Valokeila; Vedenalainen; Muu
ro-RO: Moduri scenă: Fotografie 3D; Auto; Iluminare de fundal; Plajă; Lumina lumânărilor; Prim-plan; Bucătărie specifică; Zori; Documente; Amurg; Fidel; Detaliu fin; Focuri de artificii; Floare; Alimente; Fotografie de grup; Controlul luminii de fundal HDR; Scenă nocturnă surprinsă cu un aparat foto portabil; Peisaj; Monocrom; Noapte; Panoramă; Portret; Piele netedă; Zăpadă; Sport; În lumina reflectoarelor; Subacvatic; Altele
nl: Scènemodi: 3D-fotografie; Auto; Achtergrondverlichting; Strand; Kaarslicht; Close-up; Keuken; Ochtendgloren; Documenten; Schemering; Natuurgetrouw; Fijn detail; Vuurwerk; Bloem; Voedsel; Groepsfoto; HDR-achtergrondverlichting; Nachtscène uit de hand; Landschap; Monochroom; Nacht; Panorama; Portret; Gladde huid; Sneeuw; Sport; Spotlight; Onderwater; Andere
en: Scene modes: 3D photography; Auto; Backlight; Beach; Candlelight; Close-up; Cuisine; Dawn; Documents; Dusk; Faithful; Fine detail; Fireworks; Flower; Food; Group photo; HDR backlight control; Handheld night scene; Landscape; Monochrome; Night; Panorama; Portrait; Smooth skin; Snow; Sport; Spotlight; Underwater; Other
it: Modalità di scena: Fotografia 3D; Automatica; Retroilluminazione; Spiaggia; Lume di candela; Primo piano; Cucina; Alba; Documenti; Crepuscolo; Fedele; Minimi dettagli; Fuochi d’artificio; Fiori; Alimenti; Foto di gruppo; Controllo retroilluminazione HDR; Scena notturna con camera a mano; Paesaggio; Monocromatico; Notte; Veduta; Ritratto; Pelle liscia; Neve; Sport; Riflettore; Sott’acqua; Altro
sk-SK: Režimy snímania: 3D fotografovanie; Automatický; Podsvietenie; Pláž; Svetlo sviečok; Detailný záber; Kuchyňa; Svitanie; Dokumenty; Súmrak; Verný; Jemný detail; Ohňostroje; Kvetina; Jedlo; Skupinová fotografia; Ovládanie HDR podsvietenia; Nočná scéna z ruky; Krajina; Monochromatický; Noc; Panoráma; Portrét; Hladká pokožka; Sneh; Športový; Reflektor; Podvodný; Iné
es: Modos de escena: Fotografía 3D; Automático; Retroiluminación; Playa; Luz de una vela; Acercamiento; Cocina; Amanecer; Documentos; Oscuridad; Fiel; Buen detalle; Fuegos artificiales; Flor; Comida; Foto de grupo; Control de retroiluminación HDR; Escena nocturna portátil; Paisaje; Monocromo; Noche; Panorama; Retrato; Piel suave; Nieve; Deportivo; Destacar; Bajo el agua; Otros
el: Λειτουργίες σκηνής: Τρισδιάστατη φωτογραφία; Αυτόματος; Οπίσθιος φωτισμός; Παραλία; Φως κεριών; Κοντινό πλάνο; Κουζίνα; Αυγή; Έγγραφα; Σούρουπο; Πιστή; Μικρές λεπτομέρειες; Πυροτεχνήματα; Λουλούδι; Τροφές; Ομαδική φωτογραφία; Έλεγχος οπίσθιου φωτισμού HDR; Νυχτερινή σκηνή χωρίς τρίποδο; Τοπίο; Μονόχρωμη; Νύχτα; Πανόραμα; Πορτρέτο; Λείο δέρμα; Για το χιόνι; Αθλητισμός; Κέντρο προσοχής; Υποβρύχιο; Άλλο
nb: Scenemoduser: 3D-fotografering; Auto; Bakgrunnsbelysning; Strand; Stearinlys; Nærbilde; Mat; Soloppgang; Dokumenter; Skumring; Trofast; Fine detaljer; Fyrverkeri; Blomst; Mat; Gruppebilde; HDR-baklyskontroll; Håndholdt nattscene; Landskap; Monokrom; Natt; Panorama; Portrett; Glatt hud; Snø; Sport; Spotlight; Under vann; Annen
th: โหมดฉาก: การถ่ายภาพสามมิติ; อัตโนมัติ; ไฟแบ็คไลท์; ชายหาด; แสงเทียน; ภาพใกล้; มื้ออาหาร; รุ่งเช้า; เอกสาร; พลบค่ำ; เปี่ยมศรัทธา; รายละเอียดคมชัด; ดอกไม้ไฟ; ดอกไม้; อาหาร; รูปหมู่; ตัวควบคุมแสงไฟแบ็คไลท์ HDR; ฉากกลางคืนแบบมือถือ; ภูมิประเทศ; ขาวดำ; กลางคืน; พาโนรามา; ภาพถ่ายบุคคล; ผิวเรียบเนียน; หิมะ; กีฬา; สปอตไลท์; ใต้น้ำ; อื่นๆ
ru: Режимы сценариев: 3D фотография; Авто; Подсветка; Пляж; При свечах; Крупный план; Кухня; Рассвет; Документы; Сумерки; Верность; Мелкие детали; Фейерверк; Цветы; Еда; Групповое фото; Управление подсветкой HDR; Ручная ночная съемка; Пейзаж; Монохромный; Ночь; Панорама; Портрет; Гладкая кожа; Снег; Спорт; Прожектор; Под водой; Другой
lt-LT: Scenos režimai: 3D fotografija; Automatinis; Foninis apšvietimas; Paplūdimys; Žvakių šviesa; Priartinimas; Virtuvė; Aušra; Dokumentai; Prieblanda; Ištikimas; Smulkios detalės; Fejerverkai; Gėlė; Maistas; Grupinė nuotrauka; HDR foninio apšvietimo valdymas; Rankinė naktinė scena; Peizažas; Vienspalvis; Naktis; Panorama; Portretas; Glotni oda; Sniegas; Sportas; Dėmesio centras; Povandeninis; Kita
pt-BR: Modos de cena: Fotografia em 3D; Automático; Luz de fundo; Praia; Luz de velas; Plano fechado; Cozinha; Amanhecer; Documentos; Entardecer; Fiel; Detalhe fino; Fogos de artifício; Flor; Comida; Foto de grupo; Controle de luz de fundo HDR; Cena noturna com a mão; Paisagem; Monocromático; Menos ruídos; Panorama; Retrato; Pele suave; Neve; Esporte; Destaque; Subaquático; Outro
hr-HR: Načini rada za scene: 3D fotografija; Automatski; Pozadinsko osvjetljenje; Plaža; Svjetlost svijeće; Krupni plan; Kuhinja; Zora; Dokumenti; Sumrak; Vjerni; Fini detalji; Vatromet; Cvijet; Hrana; Grupna fotografija; Kontrola HDR pozadinskog osvjetljenja; Ručna noćna scena; Krajolik; Jednobojno; Noć; Panorama; Portret; Glatka koža; Snijeg; Sportski; Reflektor; Podvodno; Ostalo
sv: Scenlägen: 3D-fotografi; Auto; Bakgrundsbelysning; Strand; Levande ljus; Närbild; Kök; Gryning; Dokument; Skymning; Trogen; Fina detaljer; Fyrverkeri; Blomma; Mat; Gruppbild; HDR-bakgrundsbelysningskontroll; Handhållen nattscen; Landskap; Svartvit; Natt; Panorama; Porträtt; Slät hud; Snö; Sport; Strålkastare; Undervatten; Annat
pl: Tryby sceny: Fotografia 3D; Automatyczna; Podświetlenie; Plaża; Światło świec; Zbliżenie; Kuchnia; Świt; Dokumenty; Zmierzch; Wierny; Drobne szczegóły; Fajerwerki; Kwiat; Żywność; Zdjęcie grupowe; Sterowanie podświetleniem HDR; Ręczna scena nocna; Krajobraz; Monochromatyczne; Noc; Panorama; Portret; Gładka skóra; Śnieg; Sport; Światło punktowe; Podwodne; Pozostałe
pt-PT: Modos de cena: Fotografia 3D; Auto; Retroiluminação; Praia; Luz de velas; Grande plano; Cozinha; Amanhecer; Documentos; Anoitecer; Fiel; Pormenores; Fogo de artifício; Flor; Bens alimentares; Foto de grupo; Controle de retroiluminação HDR; Cena noturna portátil; Paisagem; Monocromático; Noite; Panorama; Retrato; Pele macia; Neve; Desporto; Holofote; Subaquático; Outro
vi: Chế độ cảnh: Chụp ảnh 3D; Tự động; Ngược sáng; Bãi biển; Ánh nến; Cận cảnh; Ẩm thực; Rạng đông; Tài liệu; Tối mờ; Thực tế; Chi tiết đẹp; Pháo hoa; Hoa; Đồ ăn; Ảnh nhóm; Kiểm soát ngược sáng HDR; Cảnh đêm cầm tay; Phong cảnh; Đơn sắc; Giặt đêm; Toàn cảnh; Chân dung; Mịn da; Lốp đi tuyết; Sport; Spotlight; Dưới nước; Khác
cs: Scénické režimy: 3D fotografie; Automatický; Podsvícení; Pláž; Světlo svíček; Detailní záběr; Kuchyně (styl vaření); Svítání; Dokumenty; Soumrak; Věrný; Jemný detail; Ohňostroj; Květina; Jídlo; Skupinové foto; Ovládání HDR podsvícení; Ruční noční scéna; Krajina; Černobílý; Noční; Panorama; Portrét; Hladká pleť; Na sníh; Sport; Spotlight; Pod vodou; Jiné
da: Scenetilstande: 3D-fotografering; Auto; Baggrundsbelysning; Strand; Stearinlys; Nærbillede; Køkken; Daggry; Dokumenter; Skumring; Naturtro; Fine detaljer; Fyrværkeri; Blomster; Mad; Gruppebillede; HDR-baggrundsbelysningskontrol; Håndholdt natscene; Landskab; Monokrom; Nat; Panorama; Portræt; Blød hud; Sne; Sport; Spotlight; Under vandet; Andet
hu: Jelenet módok: 3D fényképezés; Automatiku; Háttérvilágítás; Strand; Gyertyafény; Közelkép; Konyha; Hajnal; Dokumentumok; Szürkület; Valósághű; Apró részletek; Tűzijáték; Virág; Élelmiszer; Csoportkép; HDR háttérvilágítás-szabályozás; Kézi éjszakai jelenet; Tájkép; Monokróm; Éjszaka; Panoráma; Portré; Sima bőr; Hó; Sport; Reflektorfény; Víz alatti; Egyéb
tr: Sahne Modları: 3D fotoğrafçılık; Otomatik; Arka ışık; Sahil; Mum ışığı; Yakın çekim; Mutfak; Şafak; Belgeler; Alacakaranlık; Sadık; İnce detay; Havai fişek; Çiçek; Yiyecek; Grup fotoğrafı; HDR arka ışık kontrolü; Elde taşınan gece çekimi; Manzara; Tek renkli; Gece; Panorama; Portre; Pürüzsüz cilt; Kar; Spor; Spot ışığı; Sualtı; Diğer
ja: シーンモード: 3D写真; 自動; バックライト; ビーチ; キャンドルライト; クローズアップ; 料理; 夜明け; ドキュメント; 夕暮れ; 修正なし; ディテール; 花火; フラワー; 食べ物; グループ写真; HDRバックライト制御; 手持ち夜景; 風景; モノクロ; 夜; パノラマ; ポートレート; 美肌; 雪; スポーツ; スポットライト; 水中; その他